Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1563
Grant recipients; periodic reports.

The department shall require periodic reports to be filed by grant recipients to enable the department to review and follow up on actions taken by grant recipients to insure that the purposes of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act are being achieved.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 30;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 18.
December 1, 2020